Utah statutes.
59-10-1403.1.   Income tax treatment of a pass-through entity taxpayer --
Return filing requirements.
(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this part, a pass-through entity
taxpayer is subject to taxation:
(a)  for a pass-through entity taxpayer that is classified as a C corporation
for federal income tax purposes:
(i)  if that pass-through entity taxpayer is a resident pass-through entity
taxpayer, as a domestic corporation is taxed under Chapter 7, Corporate
Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(ii)  if that pass-through entity taxpayer is a nonresident pass-through
entity taxpayer, as a foreign corporation is taxed under Chapter 7, Corporate
Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(b)  for a pass-through entity taxpayer that is classified as an estate,
individual, partnership, S corporation, or a trust for federal income tax
purposes:
(i)  if that pass-through entity taxpayer is a resident pass-through entity
taxpayer, as a resident estate, resident individual, resident partnership,
resident S corporation, or resident trust is taxed under this chapter; or
(ii)  if that pass-through entity taxpayer is a nonresident pass-through
entity taxpayer, as a nonresident estate, nonresident individual, nonresident
partnership, nonresident S corporation, or nonresident trust is taxed under
this chapter.
(2)  A pass-through entity taxpayer is subject to taxation on the pass-through
entity taxpayer's share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of the
pass-through entity.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b)(iii), a resident pass-through entity
taxpayer shall file a return:
(i)  if the resident pass-through entity taxpayer is classified as a C
corporation for federal income tax purposes, as a domestic corporation under
Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(ii)  if the resident pass-through entity taxpayer is classified as an estate,
individual, partnership, S corporation, or a trust for federal income tax
purposes, as a resident estate, resident individual, resident partnership,
resident S corporation, or resident trust under this chapter.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b)(ii) and subject to Subsection
(3)(b)(iii) or (iv), a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer shall file a
return:
(A)  if the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer is classified as a C
corporation for federal income tax purposes, as a foreign corporation under
Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(B)  if the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer is classified as an
estate, individual, partnership, S corporation, or a trust for federal income
tax purposes, as a nonresident estate, nonresident individual, nonresident
partnership, nonresident S corporation, or nonresident trust under this
chapter.
(ii)  A nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer is not required to file a
return if:
(A)  the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer does not have:
(I)  for a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer that is classified as a C
corporation for federal income tax purposes, unadjusted income as defined in
Section 59-7-101 derived from or connected with Utah sources, except for the
nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of income, gain, loss,
deduction, or credit of the pass-through entity;
(II)  for a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer that is classified as an
individual, partnership, or S corporation for federal income tax purposes,
adjusted gross income derived from or connected with Utah sources, except for
the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of income, gain, loss,
deduction, or credit of the pass-through entity; or
(III)  for a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer that is classified as an
estate or a trust for federal income tax purposes, unadjusted income as
defined in Section 59-10-103 derived from or connected with Utah sources,
except for the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of income,
gain, loss, deduction, or credit of the pass-through entity;
(B)  the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer does not seek to claim a tax
credit allowed against a tax imposed under:
(I)  Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(II)  this chapter;
(C)  the pass-through entity pays or withholds a tax on behalf of the
nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer and remits that tax to the
commission:
(I)  in accordance with Section 59-10-1403.2; and
(II)  if a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer is classified as a C
corporation for federal income tax purposes, in an amount that is equal to or
greater than the minimum tax under Section 59-7-104; and
(D)  the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer is not a member of a unitary
group as defined in Section 59-7-101 that is required to file a return in this
state.
(iii)  A nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer that is not otherwise
required to file a return under this Subsection (3) may file a return under:
(A)  Chapter 7, Corporate Franchise and Income Taxes; or
(B)  this chapter.
(iv)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules for a pass-through entity taxpayer, except
for a pass-through entity taxpayer who is a resident individual, to file a
return under this section if two or more pass-through entities pay or withhold
a tax in accordance with Section 59-10-1403.2 on behalf of the pass-through
entity taxpayer.
